Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 79. Alaska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act.
Sec. 21.79.100.
Prevention of insolvencies.

The director shall notify, by mail, the commissioner, director, or superintendent of insurance of the other states, territories of the United States, and the District of Columbia within 30 days after the date on which the following actions are taken against a member insurer:

revocation of a license;

suspension of a license; or

a formal order that a member insurer restrict its premium writing, obtain additional contributions to surplus, withdraw from the state, reinsure all or any part of its business, or increase capital, surplus, or any other account for the security of policyholders, contract owners, certificate holders, or creditors.

The director shall report to the board if an action set out in (a) of this section is taken or a report is received from a state insurance regulator that similar action has been taken in another state. The report to the board must contain all significant details of the action taken or the report received from another insurance regulator.

The director shall report to the board if there is reasonable cause to believe, during or after an examination of a member insurer, that the company may be impaired or insolvent.

The director shall furnish the board with the NAIC Insurance Regulatory Information System (IRIS) ratios and a listing of companies not included in the ratios developed by the NAIC, and the board may use that information to carry out its duties and responsibilities under this section. The information shall be kept confidential by the board until it is made public by the director.

The director may seek the board’s advice and recommendations concerning the financial condition of member insurers, insurers, hospital and medical service corporations, and health maintenance organizations who apply for admission to transact insurance business in the state.

The board may

make reports and recommendations to the director relating to the solvency, liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation of a member insurer or the solvency of an insurer, hospital or medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization that applies to transact insurance business in the state; the director and the board shall keep the reports and recommendations confidential;

notify the director of any information that indicates that a member insurer may be impaired or insolvent.

[Repealed, § 46 ch 119 SLA 2000.]

The board may make recommendations to the director for detecting and preventing member insurer insolvencies.

[Repealed, § 46 ch 119 SLA 2000.]

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am §§ 35, 46 ch 119 SLA 2000; am §§ 33 — 36 ch 47 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(3), inserted “, contract owners, certificate holders,” following “security of policyholders”; In (e), inserted “, hospital and medical service corporations, and health maintenance organizations” preceding “who apply for”, and made related changes; in (f), substituted “an insurer, hospital or medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization that applies” for “insurers who apply” following “the solvency of”; in (h), inserted “member” preceding “insurer insolvencies” near the end.

Sec. 21.79.110.
Miscellaneous provisions.

This chapter does not reduce the liability for unpaid assessments of an insured of an impaired or insolvent insurer operating under an insurance policy with assessment liability.

The association shall keep records of meetings relating to its activities. Records of meetings may only be made public under AS

21.79.040(b)

after the termination of a liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation proceeding that involves the impaired or insolvent insurer;

[Repealed, § 58 ch 47 SLA 2018.]

upon the order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

The association is considered to be a creditor of the impaired or insolvent insurer to the extent of assets attributable to covered policies that are reduced by an amount to which the association is entitled under AS

21.79.060(k)

. Assets of the impaired or insolvent insurer that are attributable to covered policies shall be used to continue all covered policies and pay all contractual obligations of the impaired or insolvent insurer as required by this chapter. Assets attributable to covered policies or contracts include those assets that should have been established as reserves for the covered policies or contracts. These assets are determined by multiplying the total assets of the impaired or insolvent insurer by a fraction, the numerator of which is the amount that should have been established as reserves for the covered policies or contracts of the impaired or insolvent insurer, and the denominator of which is the amount that should have been established as reserves for all policies or contracts of insurance issued in all states by that insurer. As a creditor of the impaired or insolvent insurer, the association and other similar entities in other states are entitled to receive a disbursement of assets out of the marshaled assets as a credit against contractual obligations under this chapter from time to time as the assets become available. If the liquidator has not, within 120 days after the date of a final determination of insolvency of a member insurer by the court, made an application to the court for the approval of a proposal to disburse assets, the association may make application to the court for the approval of the association’s proposal to disburse assets.

Before the termination of a liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation proceeding, the court may consider the contributions of the respective parties, including the association, shareholders, contract owners, certificate holders, enrollees, and policyholders of the impaired or insolvent insurer, and any other party with a bona fide interest, in distributing the ownership rights of the impaired or insolvent insurer. The court shall consider the welfare of policyholders, contract owners, certificate holders, and enrollees of the continuing or successor member insurer. A distribution to stockholders of an impaired or insolvent insurer may not be made until the total amount of valid claims of the association for money spent in carrying out its powers and duties under AS

21.79.060

, with respect to the impaired or insolvent insurer, has been fully recovered by the association.

[Repealed, § 58 ch 47 SLA 2018.]

A deposit in this state, held by law or required by the director for the benefit of creditors, including policy or contract owners, not turned over to the domiciliary liquidator upon the entry of a final order of liquidation or order approving a rehabilitation plan of a member insurer domiciled in this state or in a reciprocal state shall be promptly paid to the association. The association

is entitled to retain a portion of any amount paid to it equal to the percentage determined by dividing the aggregate amount of policy or contract owners’ claims related to that insolvency for which the association has provided statutory benefits by the aggregate amount of all policy or contract owners’ claims in this state related to that insolvency; and

shall remit to the domiciliary receiver the amount paid to the association and retained under (1) of this subsection; any amount paid to the association not retained by it under (1) of this subsection shall be treated as a distribution of state assets under AS

21.78.294

or a similar provision of the state of domicile of the impaired or insolvent insurer.

The association may not be required to give an appeal bond in an appeal of a civil action arising under this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am §§ 36 — 38 ch 119 SLA 2000; am §§ 37 — 39, 58 ch 47 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2018, in (c) of this section, “AS

21.79.060

(k)” was substituted for “AS

21.79.060

(s)” to reflect the 2018 relettering of AS 21.79.060.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, repealed (b)(2); in (c), inserted “or contracts” following “policies” four times, substituted “120 days after” for “120 days of” and “a member insurer” for “an insurer” in the last sentence; in (d), substituted “shareholders, contract owners, certificate holders, enrollees,” for “the shareholders” in the first sentence, inserted ", contract owners, certificate holders, and enrollees” following “policyholders” and substituted “successor member insurer” for “successor insurers” in the second sentence, inserted “impaired or insolvent” following “with respect to the” in the last sentence; repealed (e); in (f), in the introductory language, inserted “or contract” following “including policy” and substituted “a member insurer” for “an insurer”, in (f)(2), twice inserted “or contract” following “policy”.

Sec. 21.79.120.
Examination of the association, annual report.

The association may be examined by the director. The board shall submit to the director, not later than July 1 of each year, a certified financial report for the preceding calendar year in a form approved by the director and a report of its activities during the preceding calendar year. Nothing in AS

21.79.110(b)

limits the duty of the association to report under this section. Upon request, the association shall provide a copy of the report to a member insurer.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am § 39 ch 119 SLA 2000)

Sec. 21.79.130.
Tax exemption.

The association is exempt from payment of all fees and taxes levied by the state or its political subdivisions, other than real property taxes.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.79.140.
Civil immunity.

The association and its agents and employees, members of the Board of Governors, member insurers, and agents and employees of member insurers, and the director and the director’s representatives are not civilly liable, and a cause of action of any nature may not arise, for an action or omission in performing duties under this chapter. The immunity extends to the participation in an organization of one or more other state associations of similar purposes and to that organization and its agents or employees.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am § 40 ch 119 SLA 2000; am § 40 ch 47 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, inserted “, and a cause of action of any nature may not arise,” following “not civilly liable” in the first sentence, rewrote the second sentence, which read, “In this section, “duties” includes participation in any organization of one or more state associations of life or health insurers.”

Sec. 21.79.150.
Stay of proceedings; default judgment.

Proceedings involving an insolvent insurer shall be stayed at least 180 days after the date of a final order of liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation in order to allow the association to exercise a power or duty authorized under this chapter. If a default judgment is entered against an insolvent insurer, the association may apply to have the judgment set aside or may defend against the action on its merits.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am § 41 ch 119 SLA 2000; am § 41 ch 47 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For effect of this section on the Rules of Court, see § 13, ch. 52, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, substituted “at least 180 days” for “at least 60 days” following “shall be stayed”.

Sec. 21.79.160.
Prohibited advertisement of insurance sales; required notice.

A person, including a member insurer, agent, or affiliate of a member insurer, may not make, publish, disseminate, circulate, or place before the public, or cause, directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, or placed before the public, in any newspaper, magazine, or other publication, or in the form of a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, or poster, or over any radio station or television station, or in any other way, an advertisement, announcement, or statement, written or oral, that uses the existence of the association for the purpose of sales, solicitation, or inducement to purchase any form of insurance or other coverage covered by the association. However, this section does not apply to the association or any other entity that does not sell or solicit insurance, coverage by a hospital or medical service corporation, or coverage by a health maintenance organization.

The association shall prepare a summary document describing the general purposes and current limitations of this chapter and complying with (c) of this section. This document shall be submitted to the director for approval. Beginning 60 days after the date on which the director approves the document, a member insurer may not deliver a policy or contract to a policy or contract owner, certificate holder, or enrollee unless the summary document is delivered to the policy or contract owner, certificate holder, or enrollee at the time of delivery of the policy or contract. The document shall also be available upon request by a policy or contract owner, certificate holder, or enrollee. The distribution, delivery, contents, or interpretation of this document does not guarantee that either the policy or the contract, or the policy or contract owner, certificate holder, or enrollee is covered in the event of the impairment or insolvency of a member insurer. The description document shall be revised by the association as amendments to this chapter may require. Failure to receive this document does not give the policy or contract owner, certificate holder, enrollee, or insured any greater rights than those stated in this chapter.

The document prepared under (b) of this section must contain a clear and conspicuous disclaimer on its face. The director shall establish the form and content of the disclaimer. The disclaimer must

state the name and address of the association and the division of insurance;

prominently warn the policy or contract owner, certificate holder, or enrollee that the association may not cover the policy or, if coverage is available, that the policy will be subject to substantial limitations and exclusions and conditioned on continued residence in this state;

state the types of policies or contracts for which guaranty funds will provide coverage;

state that the member insurer and its agents are prohibited by law from using the existence of the association for the purpose of sales, solicitation, or inducement to purchase any form of insurance, hospital or medical service corporation coverage, or health maintenance organization coverage;

state that the policy or contract owner, certificate holder, or enrollee should not rely on coverage under the association when selecting an insurer;

explain rights available and procedures for filing a complaint to allege a violation of a provision of this chapter; and

provide other information as required by the director, including sources for information about the financial condition of insurers if the information is not proprietary and is subject by law to disclosure.

A member insurer shall retain evidence of compliance with (b) of this section for so long as the policy or contract for which the notice is given remains in effect.

History.

(§ 42 ch 119 SLA 2000; am §§ 42 — 44 ch 47 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (a), twice substituted “a member insurer” for “an insurer”, inserted “or other coverage” following “any form of insurance”, and added “, coverage by a hospital or medical service corporation, or coverage by a health maintenance organization” at the end; in (b), in the second sentence, substituted “a member insurer” for “an insurer” following “approves the document,” and twice substituted “policy or contract owner, certificate holder, or enrollee” for “policy or contract owner”, in the third sentence, substituted “or contract owner, certificate holder, or enrollee” for “owner” following “request by a policy”, in the fourth sentence, substituted “policy or contract owner, certificate holder, or enrollee” for “owner of the policy or contract,”, in the last sentence, substituted “policy or contract owner” for “policy owner, contract owner” following “give the” and inserted “enrollee,” following “certificate holder”; in (c), inserted “, certificate holder, or enrollee” following “contract owner” in (c)(2), in (c)(3), inserted “or contracts” following “types of policies”, in (c)(4), inserted “member” following “state that the” and added “, hospital or medical service corporation coverage, or health maintenance organization coverage” at the end, in (c)(5), inserted “, certificate holder, or enrollee” following “contract owner” and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 21.79.170.
Determination of principal place of business.

The principal place of business of a plan sponsor consisting of

a single employer or an employee organization is that state in which the plan sponsor exercises the direction, control, and coordination of the operations of the entity, as determined by the association in its reasonable judgment by considering the following factors: (A) the state in which the primary executive and administrative headquarters of the entity are located; (B) the state in which the principal office of the chief executive officer of the entity is located; (C) the state in which the board of directors or a similar governing body of the entity conducts the majority of its meetings; (D) the state in which the executive or management committee of the board of directors or a similar governing body of the entity conducts the majority of its meetings; (E) the state from which the management of the overall operations of the entity is directed; and (F) in the case of a benefit plan sponsored by affiliated companies making up a consolidated corporation, the state in which the holding company or controlling affiliate has its principal place of business as determined using the factors described in (A) — (E) of this paragraph; however, if more than 50 percent of the participants in the benefit plan are employed in a single state, that state is considered to be the principal place of business of a plan sponsor that is a single employer or an employee organization;

two or more employers or employee organizations is that state in which the employers or employee organizations have the largest investment in the benefit plan.

History.

(§ 42 ch 119 SLA 2000)

Sec. 21.79.180.
Determination of residency of certain individuals.

A citizen of the United States that is either a (1) resident of a foreign country, or (2) resident of a United States possession, territory, or protectorate that does not have an association similar to the association created by this chapter is, for purposes of this chapter, a resident of the state of domicile of the insurer that issued the policy or contract.

History.

(§ 42 ch 119 SLA 2000)

Sec. 21.79.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“account” means an account created under AS

21.79.040

;

“association” means the Alaska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association;

“authorized assessment” means an assessment approved by a resolution by the board that will be called immediately or in the future from member insurers for a specified amount;

“benefit plan” means a specific employee, union, or association of natural persons benefit plan;

“board” means the Board of Governors of the Alaska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association;

“called” means that a notice has been mailed by the association to member insurers requiring that an authorized assessment be paid within the time set out in the notice;

“contractual obligation” means an obligation under a policy, contract, or certificate under a group policy or contract, or a portion of one for which coverage is provided under AS

21.79.020(a)

, (b), (d), or (e);

“covered contract” or “covered policy” means a policy or contract or a portion of a policy or contract for which coverage is provided under AS

21.79.020(a)

, (b), (d), or (e);

“election date” means the date of the association’s election under AS

21.79.060(o)

;

“extra contractual claim” includes a claim related to bad faith in payment of a claim, punitive or exemplary damages, and attorney fees and costs;

“health benefit plan” means a hospital or medical expense policy or certificate, a hospital or medical service corporation subscriber contract, or a health maintenance organization subscriber contract or any other similar health contract; “health benefit plan” does not include

accident only insurance;

credit insurance;

dental only insurance;

vision only insurance;

Medicare supplement insurance;

benefits for long-term care, home health care, community-based care, or any combination thereof;

disability income insurance;

coverage for on-site medical clinics; or

specified disease, hospital confinement indemnity, or limited benefit health insurance if the types of coverage do not provide coordination of benefits and are provided under separate policies or certificates;

“impaired insurer” means a member insurer that is not an insolvent insurer and that is placed under an order of rehabilitation or conservation by a court of competent jurisdiction;

“insolvent insurer” means a member insurer that is placed under an order of liquidation by a court of competent jurisdiction with a finding of insolvency;

“member insurer” means an insurer licensed to transact insurance in the state, a hospital or medical service corporation licensed under AS 21.87, or a health maintenance organization licensed under AS 21.86, for which coverage is provided in AS

21.79.020

and includes an insurer, a hospital or medical service corporation licensed under AS 21.87, or a health maintenance organization licensed under AS 21.86, whose license or certificate of authority in this state may have been suspended, revoked, not renewed, or voluntarily withdrawn; “member insurer” does not include

a fraternal benefit society licensed under AS 21.84;

a mandatory state pooling plan;

a mutual assessment company or an entity that operates on an assessment basis;

an insurance exchange licensed under AS 21.75;

an organization that has a license or certificate limited to the issuance of charitable gift annuities; or

an entity similar to one described under (A) — (E) of this paragraph;

“NAIC” means the National Association of Insurance Commissioners;

“owner,” when used with respect to a policy or contract, “policyholder,” “policy owner,” and “contract owner”

mean the person who is identified as the legal owner under the terms of the policy or contract, or who is otherwise vested with legal title to the policy or contract through a valid assignment completed under the terms of the policy or contract and who is properly recorded as the owner on the records of the member insurer;

do not include a person with a mere beneficial interest in a policy or contract;

“plan sponsor” means, in the case of a benefit plan established or maintained by

a single employer, the employer;

an employee organization, the employee organization; or

two or more employers or jointly by one or more employers and one or more employee organizations, the association, committee, joint board of trustees, or other similar group of representatives of the parties who establish or maintain the benefit plan;

“premium” means the amounts or considerations, by whichever name called, received on a covered policy or contract less a premium, consideration, and deposit returned, and less a dividend and experience credit; “premium” does not include

amounts or considerations charged for an assessment or an amount received for a policy or contract or for the portions of a policy or contract for which coverage is not provided under AS

21.79.020(b)

and (c), except that assessable premium may not be reduced on account of AS

21.79.020(c)(4)

relating to interest limitations and AS

21.79.025(a)(2)

— (5), (b), and (d) relating to limitations with respect to one individual, one participant, and one policy or contract owner;

premiums in excess of $5,000,000 on an unallocated annuity contract not issued under a governmental retirement benefit plan or its trustee established under 26 U.S.C. 401, 26 U.S.C. 403(b), or 26 U.S.C. 457; or

with respect to multiple nongroup policies of life insurance owned by one owner, whether the policy or contract owner is an individual, firm, corporation, or other person, and whether the persons insured are officers, managers, employees, or other persons, premiums in excess of $5,000,000 with respect to those policies or contracts, regardless of the number of policies or contracts held by the owner;

“published monthly average” means the monthly average of corporate bond yields, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc., or its successor or, if Moody’s average of corporate bond yields is not published, a substantially similar average established by regulation adopted by the director;

“receivership court” means the court in the insolvent or impaired insurer’s state having jurisdiction over the conservation, rehabilitation, or liquidation of the member insurer;

“resident” means a person to whom a contractual obligation is owed under this chapter and who resides in this state on the date of entry of a court order that determines a member insurer to be an impaired or insolvent insurer; a person may be a resident of only one state, which, in the case of a person other than a natural person, shall be the principal place of business;

“state” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, or a United States possession, territory, or protectorate;

“structured settlement annuity” means an annuity purchased in order to fund periodic payments for a plaintiff or other claimant in payment for or with respect to personal injury suffered by the plaintiff or other claimant;

“supplemental contract” means a written agreement entered into for the distribution of proceeds under life, health, or annuity policy or contract benefits;

“unallocated annuity contract” means an annuity contract or group annuity certificate that is not issued to and owned by an individual, except to the extent of annuity benefits guaranteed to an individual by an insurer under the contract or certificate.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am § 102 ch 62 SLA 1995; am §§ 94, 95 ch 56 SLA 1996; am §§ 43 — 45 ch 119 SLA 2000; am § 11 ch 38 SLA 2007; am §§ 45 — 55 ch 47 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Reorganized in 2000, 2010, and 2018 to alphabetize the defined terms.

In 2018, in (9) of this section, “AS

21.79.060(o)

” was substituted for “AS

21.79.060

(aa)” to reflect the 2018 relettering of AS

21.79.060

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (5) [now (6)], substituted “has been mailed” for “has been issued” following “a notice”; in (6) [now (7)], added “for which coverage is provided under AS

21.79.020(a)

, (b), (d), or (e)” at the end; rewrote (7) [now (8)], which read, “‘covered policy’ means a policy or contract described in AS

21.79.020

(a) and (b).”; rewrote (10) [now (14)]; rewrote the introductory language in (12) [now (16)], which read, “‘owner’ in relation to a policy or contract”, in (12)(a) [now (16)(a)] inserted “member” preceding “insurer” near the end, and made stylistic changes; in (13)(c) [now (17)(c)], inserted “similar” preceding “group of representatives”; in (14) [now (18)], in the introductory language, substituted “the amounts or considerations, by whichever name called,” for “the amount”, in (14)(A) [now (18)(A)], substituted “amounts or considerations” for “an amount” at the beginning, and added “, except that assessable premium may not be reduced on account of AS 21.79020(c)(4) relating to interest limitations and AS

21.79.025(a)(2)

— (5), (b), and (d) relating to limitations with respect to one individual, one participant, and one policy or contract owner;” at the end, added (14)(B) and (C) [now (18)(B) and (C)]; in (15) [now (20)], inserted “member” preceding “insurer” near the end; in (16) [now (21)], deleted “, whichever occurs first” following “impaired or insolvent insurer”; in (19) [now (24)], substituted “a written agreement” for “an agreement” near the beginning, and inserted “proceeds under life, health, or annuity” following “the distribution of”; added (21) [now (4)], (22) [now (9)], (23) [now (10)], (24) [now (11)], and (25) [now (19)].

Sec. 21.79.990.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1990; am § 96 ch 56 SLA 1996)